Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-628.04
Joint exercise of powers; agreement; terms and conditions; agent; powers and duties; liability of district.

Any public power district or public power and irrigation district participating jointly and in cooperation with others in an electric generation or transmission facility, a hydrogen production, storage, or distribution facility, or an ethanol production or distribution facility shall own an undivided interest in such facility and be entitled to the share of the output or capacity from the facility attributable to such undivided interest. Such district may enter into an agreement or agreements with respect to each such electric generation or transmission facility, hydrogen production, storage, or distribution facility, or ethanol production or distribution facility with the other participants, and any such agreement shall contain such terms, conditions, and provisions consistent with the provisions of sections 13-803, 13-805, 13-2504, 13-2505, 70-628.02 to 70-628.04, and 70-1002.03 as the board of directors of such district shall deem to be in the interests of such district. The agreement may include, but not be limited to, provision for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such electric generation or transmission facility, hydrogen production, storage, or distribution facility, or ethanol production or distribution facility by any one of the participants, which shall be designated in or pursuant to such agreement as agent, on behalf of itself and the other participants or by such other means as may be determined by the participants and provision for a uniform method of determining and allocating among participants costs of construction, operation, maintenance, renewals, replacements, and improvements with respect to such facility. In carrying out its functions and activities as such agent with respect to construction, operation, and maintenance of such a facility, including without limitation the letting of contracts therefor, such agent shall be governed by the laws and regulations applicable to such agent as a separate legal entity and not by any laws or regulations which may be applicable to any of the other participants. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, pursuant to the terms of any such agreement in which or pursuant to which a public power district or a public power and irrigation district or a city or village of this state shall be designated as the agent thereunder for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such a facility, each of the participants may delegate its powers and duties with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility to such agent and all actions taken by such agent in accordance with the provisions of such agreement shall be binding upon each of such participants without further action or approval by their respective boards of directors or governing bodies. Such agent shall be required to exercise all such powers and perform its duties and functions under the agreement in a manner consistent with prudent utility practice. For purposes of this section, prudent utility practice means any of the practices, methods, and acts at a particular time which, in the exercise of reasonable judgment in the light of the facts including, but not limited to, the practices, methods, and acts engaged in or approved by a significant portion of the electrical utility industry, hydrogen production industry, or ethanol production industry prior thereto, known at the time the decision was made, would have been expected to accomplish the desired result at the lowest reasonable cost consistent with reliability, safety, and expedition. In no event shall anything in sections 13-803, 13-805, 13-2504, 13-2505, 70-628.02 to 70-628.04, and 70-1002.03 be deemed to authorize any district to become liable for and to pay for any costs, expenses, or liabilities attributable to the undivided interest of any other participant in such electric generation or transmission facility, and no funds of such district may be used for any such purpose.

Laws 1975, LB 104, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 41;

Laws 1997, LB 658, § 11;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 82;

Laws 2005, LB 139, § 10.